Maryland, session 2026, SB0226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Financial Institutions
13–1104.
(a) The Authority consists of:
(1) The Secretary of Housing and Community Development;
(2) The Secretary of Commerce;
(3) The Secretary of Higher Education;
(4) The Secretary of Transportation;
(5) The Secretary of Natural Resources;
(6) The Secretary of [the Department of] Planning;
– 1 –

Ch. 124 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) THE SECRETARY OF AGRICULTURE;
(8) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS;
[(7)] (9) The State Historic Preservation Officer; and
[(8)] (10) Ten members appointed by the Governor with the advice and
consent of the Senate:
(i) Two of whom shall be elected officials or representatives of local
jurisdictions;
(ii) Two of whom shall be appointed from names recommended by
the President of the Maryland Senate;
(iii) Two of whom shall be appointed from names recommended by
the Speaker of the House of Delegates;
(iv) [One of whom is a public member of the Maryland Greenways
Commission;
(v)] One of whom is a public member of the Maryland Tourism
Development Board;
(V) ONE OF WHOM IS A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC WHO HAS
SIGNIFICANT EDUCATION OR EXPERIENCE IN NATURAL RESOURCE STEWARDSHIP
OR CLIMATE RESILIENCY;
(vi) One of whom is a member of the public who has significant
education or experience in historic preservation; and
(vii) One of whom is a member of the public who has significant
education or experience in heritage tourism.
13–1105.
(a) [Nine] TEN voting members of the Authority are a quorum.
(b) An action of the Authority must receive the affirmative vote of at least a
majority of the voting members of the Authority.
(c) The Authority shall determine the times and places of its meetings.
(d) A member of the Authority:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 124
(1) May not receive compensation; but
(2) Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
13–1110.
(d) (1) The boundaries for each recognized heritage area are the boundaries
depicted on the map accompanying each proposal as approved by the Authority.
(2) After initial approval by the Authority of the boundaries of a recognized
heritage area, the Authority may amend or revise the boundaries:
(i) With the approval of all of the local jurisdictions where the
property to be added or removed is located; and
(ii) On publication in the Maryland Register of a revised drawing,
boundary description, or Uniform Resource Locator (URL) to a geographical information
system file.
(3) Boundary maps for each recognized heritage area shall be kept on file
at the Authority.
[(4) The Authority shall send a copy of each boundary map to the office of
the county clerk where the recognized heritage area is located.]
(e) Designation of a heritage area by the Authority as a recognized heritage area
establishes eligibility for [matching] grant assistance for the development of management
plans.
13–1112.
(a) [(1)] The State officials under items [(i)] (1) through [(vii)] (9) of this
subsection who have program responsibilities that affect aspects of the interpretation,
preservation, development, and use of heritage area resources shall [prepare a program
statement detailing actions] SUPPORT AND ASSIST ACTIVITIES IN CERTIFIED
HERITAGE AREAS in the areas of planning, development, use, IMPLEMENTATION,
assistance, and regulation [that support and assist the establishment and management of
certified heritage areas], as follows:
[(i)] (1) Secretary of Planning regarding local government
adoption of heritage area management plans and regarding historic preservation and
museum programs;
[(ii)] (2) Secretary of Housing and Community Development
regarding housing and neighborhood revitalization;
– 3 –

Ch. 124 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(iii)] (3) Secretary of Commerce regarding the State tourism
program and economic development and job creation activities;
[(iv)] (4) Secretary of Natural Resources regarding outdoor
recreation and the management of natural resources, including State greenways;
[(v)] (5) Secretary of Higher Education regarding educational
resources and their interpretation;
[(vi)] (6) Secretary of Transportation regarding access to and
transportation within certified heritage areas, including the scenic byways program and
programs for special signage; [and]
[(vii)] (7) Secretary of General Services regarding the management
and disposition of State property;
(8) SECRETARY OF AGRICULTURE REGARDING AGRICULTURAL
RESOURCES WITHIN CERTIFIED HERITAGE AREAS; AND
(9) STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS REGARDING
EDUCATIONAL RESOURCES AND THEIR INTERPRETATION WITHIN CERTIFIED
HERITAGE AREAS.
[(2) The State officials shall submit the program statements required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, and any revisions of the statements, to the Authority.]
(b) Units of State government that conduct or support AND ASSIST activities
affecting a certified heritage area shall:
(1) Consult, cooperate, and to the maximum extent feasible, coordinate
their activities with the unit or entity responsible for the management of each certified
heritage area;
(2) To the maximum extent practicable, carry out the activities of the unit
in a manner that is consistent with the approved management plan for the certified
heritage area; and
(3) When conducting a review of activities under §§ 5A–325 and
5A–326 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, assure that the activities will not
have an adverse effect on the historic and cultural resources of the certified heritage area,
unless there is no prudent and feasible alternative.
13–1113.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 124
(a) As provided in the State budget, AND ON TERMS AND CONDITIONS THE
AUTHORITY ESTABLISHES, the Authority may award:
(1) Grants and loans to local jurisdictions or other appropriate entities for
planning, design, acquisition, development, preservation, restoration, interpretation,
marketing, and programming of certified heritage areas; and
(2) Grants to local jurisdictions or other appropriate entities to [develop]:
(I) DEVELOP management plans in recognized heritage areas; AND
(II) ENCOURAGE REVITALIZATION OF AND REINVESTMENT IN
CERTIFIED HERITAGE AREA RESOURCES.
(B) IN AWARDING A GRANT OR LOAN UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE AUTHORITY MAY REQUIRE MATCHING FUNDS IN WHATEVER
PROPORTION THE AUTHORITY CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
[(b) A grant to develop a management plan may not exceed 50% of the cost of the
management plan.
(c) An acquisition or development grant:
(1) May not be used for any purpose other than implementation of the
certified heritage area in conformity with the approved management plan; and
(2) May not exceed 50% of the total project cost for which the grant is
awarded.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Authority may make
program grants to local jurisdictions and other appropriate entities:
(i) To develop and present interpretive exhibits, materials or other
appropriate products to further the educational and recreational objectives of the certified
heritage areas program; and
(ii) To encourage revitalization of, and reinvestment in, certified
heritage area resources.
(2) A program grant made by the Authority under paragraph (1) of this
subsection may not exceed 50% of the estimated project cost.]
[(e)] (C) Through the resources of the members of the Authority and in
cooperation with other State agencies, the Authority shall provide technical assistance to
management entities implementing a management plan.
– 5 –

Ch. 124 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the term of the initial member
of the Maryland Heritage Area Authority who is a member of the public with significant
education or experience in natural resource stewardship or climate resiliency under §
13–1104 of the Financial Institutions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall serve
the remainder of the term of the public member of the Maryland Greenways Commission
until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 6 –